Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3204
Secretary of State; rules and regulations; fees.

(1) The secretary may adopt and promulgate and alter from time to time rules and regulations relating to the administration of, but not inconsistent with, sections 71-3201 to 71-3213.

(2) The secretary shall establish fees for initial and renewal applications for applicants at rates sufficient to cover the costs of administering sections 71-3201 to 71-3213. The secretary shall remit the fees received pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 1959, c. 329, § 4, p. 1197;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 25, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 31.